California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) A person who commits a violation of Section 22507.8 is subject to either a civil notice of parking violation pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17 or a criminal notice to appear.

(b) If a notice to appear is issued and upon conviction of an infraction for a violation of Section 22507.8, a person shall be punished as follows:

(1) A fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for the first offense.

(2) A fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than seven hundred fifty
 dollars ($750) for the second offense.

(3) A fine of not less than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for three or more offenses.

(c) The court may suspend the imposition of the fine if the person convicted possessed at the time of the offense, but failed to display, a valid special identification license plate issued pursuant to Section 5007 or a distinguishing placard issued pursuant to Section 22511.55 or 22511.59.

(d) A fine imposed under this section may be paid in installments if the court determines that the defendant is unable to pay the entire amount in one payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 233.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.14.

(a) Every person convicted of an infraction for the offense of disconnecting, modifying, or altering a required pollution control device in violation of Section 27156 shall be punished as follows:

(1) For a first conviction, by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50), nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For a second or subsequent conviction, by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) (1) The fines collected under subdivision (a) shall be allocated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42001.2.

(2) The amounts allocated pursuant to paragraph (1) to the air pollution control district or air quality management district in which the infraction occurred shall first be allocated to the State Air Resources Board and the Bureau of Automotive Repair to pay the costs of the state board and the bureau under Article 8 (commencing with Section 44080) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) The funds collected under subdivision (a) which are not required for purposes of paragraph (2) shall be used for the enforcement of Section 27156 or for the implementation of Article 8 (commencing with Section 44080) of Chapter 5 of Part 5 of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 972, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.15.

Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 21453, subdivision (c) of Section 21454, or subdivision (a) of Section 21457 shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 852, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.16.

(a) Every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 21752, subdivision (c) of Section 22526, or Section 22450, involving railroad grade crossings, or Section 22451 or 22452 shall be punished as follows:

(1) For the first infraction, by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(2) For a second infraction of any of the offenses described in this subdivision occurring within one year of a prior infraction that resulted in a conviction, by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

(3) For a third or any subsequent infraction of any of the offenses described in this subdivision occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions that resulted in convictions, by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(b) In addition to the fine imposed pursuant to subdivision (a), a court, in a county in which Section 369b of the Penal Code applies, may require the person to attend a traffic school as described in Section 369b of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 716, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.17.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 21951 shall be punished as follows:

(a) For the first infraction, by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) For a second infraction for a violation of Section 21951 occurring within one year of a prior infraction of violating of that section that resulted in a conviction, by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200), as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42001.

(c) For a third or any subsequent infraction for a violation of Section 21951 occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions of violating that section that resulted in convictions, by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250), as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 42001.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 833, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.18.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every person convicted of an infraction for a violation of Section 21971 shall be punished as follows:

(a) For the first infraction, by a fine of two hundred twenty dollars ($220).

(b) For a second infraction for a violation of Section 21971 occurring within one year of a prior violation of that section that resulted in a conviction, by a fine of three hundred twenty dollars ($320).

(c) For a third or any subsequent infraction for a violation of Section 21971 occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions of violating that section that resulted in convictions by a fine of three hundred seventy dollars ($370).

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 833, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.19.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person convicted of a violation of Section 21070 is punishable, as follows:

(a) For a violation involving bodily injury, by a fine of seventy dollars ($70).

(b) For a violation involving great bodily injury, as defined in Section 12022.7 of the Penal Code, by a fine of ninety-five dollars ($95).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 898, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.20.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who violates subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 27000 is punishable as follows:

(a) By a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150).

(b) For a second infraction occurring within one year of a prior infraction that resulted in a conviction, a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

(c) For a third or any subsequent infraction occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions that resulted in convictions, a fine, not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 166, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

42001.25.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who violates Section 23140 is punishable as follows:

(a) By a fine of one hundred dollars ($100).

(b) For a second infraction occurring within one year of a prior infraction that resulted in a conviction, a fine of two hundred dollars ($200).

(c) For a third or any subsequent infraction occurring within one year of two or more prior infractions that resulted in convictions, a fine of three hundred dollars ($300).

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 899, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

42002.

Unless a different penalty is expressly provided by this code, every person convicted of a misdemeanor for a violation of any of the provisions of this code shall be punished by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 404.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

42002.1.

A person convicted of a misdemeanor violation of Section 2800, 2801, or 2803, insofar as it affects a failure to stop and submit to inspection of equipment or for an unsafe condition endangering a person, shall be punished as follows:

(a) By a fine not exceeding fifty dollars ($50) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding five days.

(b) For a second conviction within a period of one year, a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding 10 days, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(c) For a third or a subsequent conviction within a period of one year, a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 898, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

42002.4.

A violation of Section 10751 shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months if the value of the property does not exceed nine hundred fifty dollars ($950), and by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding one year if the value of the property is more than nine hundred fifty dollars ($950).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 28, Sec. 55.   (SB 18 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

42002.5.

Notwithstanding Section 42002, every person convicted of a violation of Section 10852 or 10853 involving a vehicle that has been modified for the use of a disabled veteran or any other disabled person and that displays a special identification license plate issued pursuant to Section 5007 or a distinguishing placard issued pursuant to Section 22511.55 or 22511.59, if those facts are known or should reasonably have been known to the person, shall be punished by a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1149, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

42003.

(a) A judgment that a person convicted of an infraction be punished by a fine may also provide for the payment to be made within a specified time or in specified installments. A judgment granting a defendant time to pay the fine shall order that if the defendant fails to pay the fine or any installment thereof on the date that it is due, he or she shall appear in court on that date for further proceedings. Willful violation of the order is punishable as contempt.

(b) A judgment that a person convicted of any other violation of this code be punished by a fine may also order, adjudge, and decree that the person be imprisoned until the fine is satisfied. In all of these cases, the judgment shall specify the extent of the imprisonment which shall not exceed one day for every thirty dollars ($30) of the fine, nor extend in this case beyond the term for which the defendant might be sentenced to imprisonment for the offense of which he or she was convicted.

(c) In any case when a person appears before a traffic referee or judge of the superior court for adjudication of a violation of this code, the court, upon request of the defendant, shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay. Consideration of a defendant’s ability to pay may include his or her future earning capacity. A defendant shall bear the burden of demonstrating lack of his or her ability to pay. Express findings by the court as to the factors bearing on the amount of the fine shall not be required. The reasonable cost of these services and of probation shall not exceed the amount determined to be the actual average cost thereof. The court shall order the defendant to appear before a county officer designated by the court to make an inquiry into the ability of the defendant to pay all or a portion of those costs or the court or traffic referee may make this determination at a hearing. At that hearing, the defendant shall be entitled to have, but shall not be limited to, the opportunity to be heard in person, to present witnesses and other documentary evidence, to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, to disclosure of the evidence against him or her, and to a written statement of the findings of the court or the county officer. If the court determines that the defendant has the ability to pay all or part of the costs, the court shall set the amount to be reimbursed and order the defendant to pay that sum to the county in the manner in which the court believes reasonable and compatible with the defendant’s financial ability; or, with the consent of a defendant who is placed on probation, the court shall order the probation officer to set the amount of payment, which shall not exceed the maximum amount set by the court, and the manner in which the payment shall be made to the county. In making a determination of whether a defendant has the ability to pay, the court shall take into account the amount of any fine imposed upon the defendant and any amount the defendant has been ordered to pay in restitution.

The court may hold additional hearings during the probationary period. If practicable, the court or the probation officer shall order payments to be made on a monthly basis. Execution may be issued on the order in the same manner as a judgment in a civil action. The order to pay all or part of the costs shall not be enforced by contempt.

A payment schedule for reimbursement of the costs of presentence investigation based on income shall be developed by the probation department of each county and approved by the presiding judge of the superior court.

(d) The term “ability to pay” means the overall capability of the defendant to reimburse the costs, or a portion of the costs, of conducting the presentence investigation, preparing the presentence report, and probation, and includes, but is not limited to, all of the following regarding the defendant:

(1) Present financial position.

(2) Reasonably discernible future financial position. In no event shall the court consider a period of more than six months from the date of the hearing for purposes of determining reasonably discernible future financial position.

(3) Likelihood that the defendant will be able to obtain employment within the six-month period from the date of the hearing.

(4) Any other factors that may bear upon the defendant’s financial capability to reimburse the county for the costs.

(e) At any time during the pendency of the judgment rendered according to the terms of this section, a defendant against whom a judgment has been rendered may petition the rendering court to modify or vacate its previous judgment on the grounds of a change of circumstances with regard to the defendant’s ability to pay the judgment. The court shall advise the defendant of this right at the time of rendering of the judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 605.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42004.

For the purpose of determining the penalty to be imposed pursuant to this code, the court may consider a written report from the Department of Motor Vehicles containing information from its records showing prior convictions; and the communication is prima facie evidence of such convictions, if the defendant admits them, regardless of whether or not the complaint commencing the proceedings has alleged prior convictions.

For the purpose of this chapter a prior bail forfeiture shall be deemed to be a conviction of the offense charged.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

42004.5.

Upon conviction of any violation of any provision of this code, other than a felony violation and except this section, execution of sentence of imprisonment in the county jail shall be suspended, at the request of the convicted person, for a period of 24 hours, unless the judge determines that the person would not return. If, prior to the end of such period, the person does not deliver himself into custody for commencement of the execution of such sentence, his failure to appear shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1184.)
-------------------------------------------

42005.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, after a deposit of the fee under Section 42007 or bail, a plea of guilty or no contest, or a conviction, a court may order or permit a person who holds a noncommercial class C, class M1, or class M2 driver’s license who pleads guilty or who pleads no contest or who is convicted of a traffic offense to attend a traffic violator school licensed pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 11200) of Division 5.

(b) To the extent the court is in conformance with Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and except as otherwise provided in this section, the court may, after deposit of the fee under Section 42007 or bail, order or permit a person who holds a class A, class B, or commercial class C driver’s license,
 who pleads guilty or no contest or is convicted of a traffic offense, to complete a course of instruction at a licensed traffic violator school if the person was operating a vehicle requiring only a class C license, or a class M license. The court may not order that the record of conviction be kept confidential. However, the conviction shall not be added to a violation point count for purposes of determining whether a driver is presumed to be a negligent operator under Section 12810.5.

(c) The court shall not order that a conviction of an offense be kept confidential according to Section 1808.7, order or permit avoidance of consideration of violation point counts under subdivision (b), or permit a person, regardless of the driver’s license class, to complete a program at a licensed traffic violator school in lieu of adjudicating an offense if any of the following applies to the offense:

(1) It occurred in a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 15210.

(2) Is a violation of Section 20001, 20002, 23103, 23104, 23105, 23140, 23152, or 23153, or of Section 23103, as specified in Section 23103.5.

(3) It is a violation described in subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 12810.

(d) A person ordered to attend a traffic violator school pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) may choose the traffic violator school the person will attend. The court shall provide to each person subject to that order or referral the department’s current list of licensed traffic violator schools.

(e) A person who fails to comply with a court order to attend traffic violator school shall not be assessed any additional penalties for
 their failure to comply, however the provisions of Section 1808.7 shall not apply to a person who fails to attend traffic violator school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 85, Sec. 2.   (AB 466)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

42005.1.

The court may order a person designated to attend a traffic violator school to instead participate in a study of traffic violator schools licensed pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 11200) of Division 5. The person’s participation in that study constitutes attending a licensed traffic violator school program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 13.7.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

42005.3.

(a) A local authority shall not allow a person who is alleged to have committed a traffic offense in violation of this code, or an ordinance or resolution adopted under this code, to participate in a driver awareness or education program or in any other diversion program as an alternative to the procedure required to be followed under this code for alleged violations of this code.

(b) This section does not apply to a diversion
 program sanctioned by local law enforcement for a person who committed an infraction not involving a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   (AB 902)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

42005.5.

Notwithstanding Section 46300 or 84500 of the Education Code or any other provision of law, on and after September 1, 1985, attendance at a school for traffic violators permitted or ordered pursuant to Section 41501 or 42005 shall not be included in computing the average daily attendance of any school district, community college district, or other public educational institution for purposes of allocation of state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 15.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

42006.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), there may be levied a special assessment in an amount equal to one dollar ($1) for every fine, forfeiture, and traffic violator school fee imposed and collected by any court that conducts a night or weekend session of the court, on all offenses involving a violation of a section of this code or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code, except offenses relating to parking.

(b) When a person makes a deposit of bail for an offense to which this section applies, in a case in which the person is required to appear in a court that conducts a night or weekend session, the person making the deposit shall also deposit a sufficient amount to include the assessment prescribed in this section for forfeited bail. If bail is forfeited, the amount of the assessment shall be transmitted by the clerk of the court to the county treasury for disposition as prescribed by subdivision (d).

(c) If a court conducts night or weekend sessions at two or more locations, the court may do either of the following:

(1) Levy assessments only on those persons who are required to appear at the location where night or weekend sessions are held.

(2) Levy assessments on persons who have the option to appear at a location where night or weekend court sessions are held and that is within 25 miles of the location of the court where the person is otherwise required to appear.

(d) After a determination by the court of the amount of the assessment due, the clerk of the court shall collect the amount and transmit it as provided in subdivision (g).

(e) In any case where a person convicted of any offense to which this section applies is imprisoned until the fine is satisfied, the court shall waive the penalty assessment.

(f) As used in subdivisions (g) and (h), the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Court Facilities Trust Fund” means the fund established by Section 70352 of the Government Code.

(2) “Location” means a court facility holding night or weekend sessions under this section.

(3) “Transfer of responsibility” means the transfer of responsibility for court facilities from the counties to the state pursuant to Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 70301) of Title 8 of the Government Code.

(g) (1) If transfer of responsibility for a location has occurred, the clerk shall collect any assessment imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) and transmit it to the Court Facilities Trust Fund. Moneys deposited pursuant to this subdivision shall be used for any purpose provided by subdivision (b) of Section 70352 of the Government Code.

(2) If transfer of responsibility for a location has not occurred, the clerk shall collect any assessment imposed pursuant to subdivision (c) and transmit it to the county treasury to be deposited in the night court session fund, and the moneys in the fund shall be expended by the county for maintaining courts for which transfer of responsibility has not occurred and that have night or weekend sessions for traffic offenses.

(h) (1) The county treasurer of each county shall transfer from the night court session fund to the Court Facilities Trust Fund an amount that is the same percentage of the night court session fund as of January 1, 2009, as the square footage of locations for which transfer of responsibility has occurred on or before January 1, 2009, is to the total square footage of locations.

(2) For locations for which transfer of responsibility occurs after January 1, 2009, the county treasurer shall, at the time of transfer of any location, transfer from the night court session fund to the Court Facilities Trust Fund an amount that is the same percentage of the night court session fund as the square footage of the location for which transfer of responsibility is occurring is to the sum of the square footage of locations for which transfer of responsibility has not occurred and the square footage of the location being transferred.

(3) Upon the transfer of responsibility for all locations, the county treasurer shall transfer to the Court Facilities Trust Fund any amount remaining in the night court session fund.

(4) Any expenditures made from the fund for a purpose other than those specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) shall be repaid to the state for deposit in the Court Facilities Trust Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 218, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

42007.

(a) (1) The clerk of the court shall collect a fee from every person who is ordered or permitted to attend a traffic violator school pursuant to Section 41501 or 42005 in an amount equal to the total bail set forth for the eligible offense on the uniform countywide bail schedule. As used in this subdivision, “total bail” means the amount established pursuant to Section 1269b of the Penal Code in accordance with the Uniform Bail and Penalty Schedule adopted by the Judicial Council, including all assessments, surcharges, and penalty amounts. Where multiple offenses are charged in a single notice to appear, the “total bail” is the amount applicable for the greater of the qualifying offenses. However, the court may determine a lesser fee under this subdivision upon a
 showing that the defendant is unable to pay the full amount.

The fee shall not include the cost, or any part thereof, of traffic safety instruction offered by a traffic violator school.

(2) The clerk may accept from a defendant who is ordered or permitted to attend traffic violator school a payment of at least 10 percent of the fee required by paragraph (1) upon filing a written agreement by the defendant to pay the remainder of the fee according to an installment payment schedule of no more than 90 days as agreed upon with the court. The Judicial Council shall prescribe the form of the agreement for payment of the fee in installments. When the defendant signs the Judicial Council form for payment of the fee in installments, the court shall continue the case to the date in the agreement to complete payment of the fee and submit the certificate of completion of traffic violator school to the court. The
 clerk shall collect a fee of up to thirty-five dollars ($35) to cover administrative and clerical costs for processing an installment payment of the traffic violator school fee under this paragraph.

(3) If a defendant fails to make an installment payment of the fee according to an installment agreement, the court may convert the fee to bail, declare it forfeited, and report the forfeiture as a conviction under Section 1803. The court may also charge a failure to pay under Section 40508 and impose a civil assessment as provided in Section 1214.1 of the Penal Code or issue an arrest warrant for a failure to pay. For the purposes of reporting a conviction under this subdivision to the department under Section 1803, the date that the court declares the bail forfeited shall be reported as the date of conviction.

(b) Revenues derived from the fee collected under this section shall be
 deposited in accordance with Section 68084 of the Government Code in the general fund of the county and, as may be applicable, distributed as follows:

(1) In any county in which a fund is established pursuant to Section 76100 or 76101 of the Government Code, the sum of one dollar ($1) for each fund so established shall be deposited with the county treasurer and placed in that fund.

(2) In any county that has established a Maddy Emergency Medical Services Fund pursuant to Section 1797.98a of the Health and Safety Code, an amount equal to the sum of each two dollars ($2) for every seven dollars ($7) that would have been collected pursuant to Section 76000 of the Government Code and, commencing January 1, 2009, an amount equal to the sum of each two dollars ($2) for every ten dollars ($10) that would have been collected pursuant to Section 76000.5 of the Government Code with respect
 to those counties to which that section is applicable shall be deposited in that fund. Nothing in the act that added this paragraph shall be interpreted in a manner that would result in either of the following:

(A) The utilization of penalty assessment funds that had been set aside, on or before January 1, 2000, to finance debt service on a capital facility that existed before January 1, 2000.

(B) The reduction of the availability of penalty assessment revenues that had been pledged, on or before January 1, 2000, as a means of financing a facility which was approved by a county board of supervisors, but on January 1, 2000, is not under construction.

(3) The amount of the fee that is attributable to Section 70372 of the Government Code shall be transferred pursuant to subdivision (f) of that section.

(c) For fees resulting from city arrests, an amount equal to the amount of base fines that would have been deposited in the treasury of the appropriate city pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 1463.001 of the Penal Code shall be deposited in the treasury of the appropriate city.

(d) The clerk of the court, in a county that offers traffic school shall include in any courtesy notice mailed to a defendant for an offense that qualifies for traffic school attendance the following statement:

 

NOTICE: If you are eligible and decide not to attend traffic school your automobile insurance may be adversely affected. For drivers with a noncommercial driver’s license, one conviction in any 18-month period will be held confidential and not show on your driving
 record if you complete a traffic violator school program. For drivers with a commercial driver’s license, one conviction in any 18-month period will show on your driving record without a violation point if you complete a traffic violator school program.

 

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county that has established a Maddy Emergency Medical Services Fund pursuant to Section 1797.98a of the Health and Safety Code shall not be held liable for having deposited into the fund, prior to January 1, 2009, an amount equal to two dollars ($2) for every ten dollars ($10) that would have been collected pursuant to Section 76000.5 of the Government Code from revenues derived from traffic violator school fees collected pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 523, Sec. 31.   (SB 788)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

42007.1.

(a) The amount collected by the clerk pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42007 shall be in an amount equal to the total bail set forth for the eligible offense on the uniform countywide bail schedule plus a forty-nine-dollar ($49) fee, and a fee determined by the department to be sufficient to defray the cost of routine monitoring of traffic violator school instruction pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11208, and a fee, if any, established by the court pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11205.2 to defray the costs incurred by a traffic assistance program.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 42007, the revenue from the forty-nine-dollar ($49) fee collected under this section shall be deposited in the county general fund. Fifty-one
 percent of the amount collected under this section and deposited into the county general fund shall be transmitted therefrom monthly to the Controller for deposit in the State Court Facilities Construction Fund, established in Section 70371 of the Government Code.

(c) The fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11208 shall be allocated to the department to defray the costs of monitoring traffic violator school instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 79, Sec. 38.   (AB 143)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

42007.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 42007, revenues derived from fees collected under Section 42007 from each person required or permitted to attend traffic violator school pursuant to Section 41501 or 42005 as a result of a violation of subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 21453, subdivision (c) of Section 21454, or subdivision (a) of Section 21457 shall be allocated as follows:

(1) The first 30 percent of the amount collected shall be allocated to the general fund of the city or county in which the offense occurred.

(2) The balance of the amount collected shall be deposited by the county treasurer under Section 42007.

(b) This section does not apply to the additional forty-nine-dollar ($49) court administrative fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11208 collected under subdivision (a) of Section 42007.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 18.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

42007.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 42007, revenues derived from fees collected under Section 42007 from each person required or permitted to attend traffic violator school pursuant to Section 369b of the Penal Code as a result of a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 21752, involving railroad grade crossings, or Section 22451 or 22452 shall be allocated as follows:

(1) If the offense occurred in an area where a transit district or transportation commission established under Division 12 (commencing with Section 130000) of the Public Utilities Code provides rail transportation, the first 30 percent of the amount collected shall be allocated to the general fund of that transit district
 or transportation commission to be used only for public safety and public education purposes relating to railroad grade crossings.

(2) If there is no transit district or transportation commission providing rail transportation in the area where the offense occurred, the first 30 percent of the amount collected shall be allocated to the general fund of the county in which the offense occurred, to be used only for public safety and public education purposes relating to railroad grade crossings.

(3) The balance of the amount collected shall be deposited by the county treasurer under Section 1463 of the Penal Code.

(4) A transit district, transportation commission, or a county that is allocated funds pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) shall provide public safety and public education relating to railroad grade crossings only
 to the extent that those purposes are funded by the allocations provided pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) This section does not apply to the additional forty-nine-dollar ($49) court administrative fee assessed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11208 collected under subdivision (a) of Section 42007.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 599, Sec. 19.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

42008.

(a) Any county may operate an amnesty program for delinquent fines and bail imposed for an infraction or misdemeanor violation of the Vehicle Code, except parking violations of the Vehicle Code and violations of Section 23103, 23104, 23152, or 23153. The program shall be implemented by the courts in accordance with Judicial Council guidelines, and shall apply to infraction or misdemeanor violations of the Vehicle Code, except parking violations, upon which a fine or bail was delinquent on or before April 1, 1991.

(b) Under the amnesty program, any person owing a fine or bail due on or before April 1, 1991, that was imposed for an infraction or misdemeanor violation of the Vehicle Code, except violations of Section 23103, 23104, 23152, or 23153 or parking violations, may pay to the superior court the amount scheduled by the court, which shall be either (1) 70 percent of the total fine or bail or (2) the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for an infraction or five hundred dollars ($500) for a misdemeanor. This amount shall be accepted by the court in full satisfaction of the delinquent fine or bail.

(c) No criminal action shall be brought against any person for a delinquent fine or bail paid under this amnesty program and no other additional penalties shall be assessed for the late payment of the fine or bail made under the amnesty program. 

(d) Notwithstanding Section 1463 of the Penal Code, the total amount of funds collected by the courts pursuant to the amnesty program created by this section shall be deposited in the county treasury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 606.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

42008.5.

(a) A county may establish a one-time amnesty program for fines and bail that have been delinquent for not less than six months as of the date upon which the program commences and were imposed for an infraction or misdemeanor violation of this code, except parking violations of this code and violations of Section 23103, 23104, 23105, 23152, or 23153.

(b) A person owing a fine or bail that is eligible for amnesty under the program may pay to the superior or juvenile court the amount scheduled by the court, that shall be accepted by the court in full satisfaction of the delinquent fine or bail and shall be either of the following:

(1) Seventy percent of the total fine or bail.

(2) The amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for an infraction or five hundred dollars ($500) for a misdemeanor.

(c) The amnesty program shall be implemented by the courts of the county on a one-time basis and conducted in accordance with Judicial Council guidelines for a period of not less than 120 days. The program shall operate not longer than six months from the date the court initiates the program.

(d) No criminal action shall be brought against a person for a delinquent fine or bail paid under the amnesty program and no other additional penalties, except as provided in Section 1214.1 of the Penal Code, shall be assessed for the late payment of the fine or bail made under the amnesty program.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 1463 of the Penal Code, the total amount of funds collected by the courts pursuant to the amnesty program shall be deposited in the county treasury until 150 percent of the cost of operating the program, excluding capital expenditures, have been so deposited. Thereafter, 37 percent of the amount of the delinquent fines and bail deposited in the county treasury shall be distributed by the county pursuant to Section 1464 of the Penal Code, 26 percent of the amount deposited shall be distributed by the county pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 76100) of Chapter 12 of Title 8 of the Government Code, and the remaining 37 percent of the amount deposited shall be retained by the county.
